Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4019.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 471a. Beginning with the 2025 tax year, in cooperation with the state budget office, the department shall provide by mail to each taxpayer filing an annual return under this part, a single page revenue report that includes, at a minimum, the following information related to the individual income tax revenue collection and distribution for the most recently completed state fiscal year: (a) Total revenues collected attributable to each of the following and the corresponding percentage as it relates to the gross revenue collection: (i) Wage and salary withholdings. (ii) Quarterly payments. (iii) Flow-through entity tax. (iv) Annual payments. (b) Total amount of refunds issued. (c) Total distributions to each of the following: (i) General fund. (ii) School aid fund created in section 11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. (iii) Michigan transportation fund created in section 10 of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.660. (iv) Renew Michigan fund created in section 51g. (v) State campaign fund created in section 61 of the Michigan campaign finance act, 1976 PA 388, MCL 169.261.